Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB485.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 202A.011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Authorized staff physician" means a physician who is a bona fide member of the
hospital's medical staff;
(2) "Benefit from treatment" means the desired outcomes of treatment in a
psychiatric hospital for an individual with a mental illness, including but not
limited to:
(a) Symptom management and increased stability;
(b) A lessening of irrational thoughts and behaviors;
(c) Reduced risk of harm; or
(d) Acquisition of skills for self-care and for interacting and living in the
community;
(3) "Cabinet" means the [Kentucky ]Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(4)[(3)] "Contract mental health evaluator" means a qualified mental health
professional who is employed by or under contract with a community mental health
center, crisis stabilization unit, mental institution, or any other facility designated by
the secretary to provide mental health evaluations to determine whether an
individual meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization;
(5)[(4)] "Danger" or "threat of danger to self, family, or others" means, as a result of
mental illness, a person:
(a) Presents a substantial risk of serious physical harm to[or threat of substantial
physical harm upon] self, family, or others as evidenced by recent behavior,
threats, or conduct demonstrating such risk;[,]
(b) Has attempted or threatened suicide or has expressed suicidal ideations and
there is a reasonable probability of serious self-harm unless prompt and
Page 1 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
adequate treatment is provided;
(c) Is unable without supervision or assistance to provide for[including actions
which deprive self, family, or others of the] basic personal needs,[means of
survival] including provision for reasonable shelter, food, [or ]clothing, or
medical care, so that there exists a substantial likelihood of death, serious
physical injury, or serious physical debilitation. For purposes of this
paragraph, a person shall be deemed unable to provide for basic personal
needs even if a guardian, family member, or friend is willing and able to
provide assistance; or
(d) Is experiencing psychiatric deterioration, demonstrated by a substantial
decline in functioning from the person's baseline, such that the person's
judgment, insight, or ability to recognize the need for treatment is impaired,
and without intervention, the person's condition will predictably result in:
1. A substantial risk of serious physical harm to self, family, or others;
2. Serious physical debilitation or self-neglect; or
3. Further loss of ability to engage in safe or necessary self-care or to
voluntarily seek needed treatment;
(6)[(5)] "Forensic psychiatric facility" means a mental institution or facility, or part
thereof, designated by the secretary for the purpose and function of providing
inpatient evaluation, care, and treatment for [mentally ill persons or ]individuals
with an intellectual disability or mental illness, who have been charged with or
convicted of a felony;
(7)[(6)] "Hospital" means:
(a) A state mental hospital or institution or other licensed public or private
hospital, institution, health-care facility, or part thereof, approved by the
cabinet[Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services] as equipped to
provide full-time residential care and treatment for [mentally ill persons or
Page 2 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
]individuals with an intellectual disability or mental illness; or
(b) A hospital, institution, or health-care facility of the government of the United
States equipped to provide residential care and treatment for [mentally ill
persons or ]individuals with an intellectual disability or mental illness;
(8) "Individual with a mental illness" means a person with substantially impaired
capacity to use self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of the person's
affairs and social relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized
emotional symptoms where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or
emotional symptoms can be related to physiological, psychological, or social
factors;
(9)[(7)] "Judge" means any judge or justice of the Court of Justice or a trial
commissioner of the District Court acting under authority of SCR 5.030;
(10)[(8)] "Least restrictive alternative mode of treatment" means that treatment which
will give an[a mentally ill] individual with a mental illness a realistic opportunity
to improve the individual's level of functioning, consistent with accepted
professional practice in the least confining setting available;[
(9) "Mentally ill person" means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use
self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of the person's affairs and social
relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms
where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be
related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;]
(11)[(10)] "Patient" means a person under observation, care, or treatment in a hospital
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(12)[(11)] "Petitioner" means a person who institutes a proceeding under this chapter;
(13)[(12)] "Psychiatric facility" means a crisis stabilization unit or any facility licensed
by the cabinet and which provides inpatient, outpatient, psychosocial rehabilitation,
emergency, and consultation and education services for the diagnosis and treatment
Page 3 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
of persons who have a mental illness;
(14)[(13)] "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the performance of official duties;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the practice of official duties, who is certified or eligible to apply
for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
(c) A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological
practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate, licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A licensed registered nurse with a master's degree in psychiatric nursing from
an accredited institution and two (2) years of clinical experience with
individuals with a mental illness[mentally ill persons], or a licensed
registered nurse, with a bachelor's degree in nursing from an accredited
institution, who is certified as a psychiatric and mental health nurse by the
American Nurses Association and who has three (3) years of inpatient or
outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric nursing and is currently employed
by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or
a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a private agency or company
engaged in the provision of mental health services or a regional community
program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic
Page 4 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of
mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit
of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health
and individuals with an intellectual disability;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS Chapter
335.500 to 335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit
of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health
and individuals with an intellectual disability; or
(h) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one
(1) of the following requirements:
1. Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric
residency program for physician assistants;
2. Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience
under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a
psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American
Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
3. Holds a master's degree from a physician assistant program accredited
Page 5 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is
practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840,
and:
a. Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least two (2) years; or
4. Holds a bachelor's degree, possesses a current physician assistant
certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under
a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:
a. Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least three (3) years;
(15)[(14)] "Residence" means legal residence as determined by applicable principles
governing conflicts of law;
(16)[(15)] "Respondent" means a person alleged in a hearing under this chapter to be [a
mentally ill person or ]an individual with an intellectual disability or mental
Page 6 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
illness;[ and]
(17)[(16)] "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services[.]; and
(18) "Serious mental illness":
(a) Means a diagnosable mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder that causes
significant functional impairment that substantially interferes with or limits
major life activities, including but not limited to:
1. Severe cognitive difficulties, including disorganized thinking,
delusions, hallucinations, or memory impairment; or
2. Extreme mood fluctuations, apathy, or lack of motivation; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to the following disorders:
1. Schizophrenia spectrum and other psychotic disorders;
2. Bipolar and related disorders; and
3. Major depressive disorders that require treatment.
Section 2. KRS 202A.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to completion of an examination by a qualified mental health professional
under this section, the professional shall make a good-faith attempt to contact the
petitioner to obtain any additional relevant information necessary to the petition.
(2) (a) Prior to the completion of an examination under this section, the county
attorney may make an ex parte motion for a certification review hearing.
The court shall review the ex parte motion upon its receipt.
(b) If the review indicates that the person presents an imminent threat of
danger to self, family, or others, the court shall order the qualified mental
health professional to immediately notify the court if the professional has
certified that the person:
1. Is an individual with a mental illness;
2. Presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others as a
Page 7 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
result of the mental illness; and
3. Does not meet the other criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(c) The court shall review the certification under paragraph (b) of this
subsection and consider if the person has been the subject of proceedings
under this chapter, prior to the current proceeding, and is exhibiting an
escalation of dangerous behavior. After review, the court may:
1. Order the person to be hospitalized in a place designated by the
cabinet until the certification review hearing is held within forty-eight
(48) hours, excluding weekends and holidays;
2. Release the person and set the certification review hearing to be held
within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and holidays; or
3. Deny the county attorney's motion for a certification review.
(d) At the certification review hearing:
1. The qualified mental health professional that performed the
examination shall testify about the certification under paragraph (b)
of this subsection. This testimony may be given remotely; and
2. The person shall be appointed counsel who may present evidence and
cross examine witnesses on the person's behalf.
(e) Upon conclusion of the certification review hearing, if the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that the person is an individual with a mental
illness, who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others
as a result of the mental illness, who may reasonably benefit from court-
ordered outpatient treatment or release with other reasonable conditions,
and for whom court-ordered outpatient treatment or release with other
reasonable conditions is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment
available, the court shall order:
Page 8 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
1. a. The person to receive community-based outpatient treatment that
shall not exceed three hundred sixty (360) days; and
b. The person to comply with any other reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure compliance; or
2. The person to be released with any reasonable conditions necessary to
ensure the safety of self, family, or others and avoid readmittance to a
hospital setting.
(3) (a) Failure to comply with any reasonable conditions or an order for
community-based outpatient treatment under subsection (2)(e) of this
section shall not be grounds to find the person in contempt of court but
shall be prima facie evidence that:
1. The person can benefit from inpatient hospitalization; and
2. Inpatient hospitalization is the least restrictive mode of treatment.
(b) If a new petition for involuntary hospitalization is filed within twelve (12)
months due to failure to comply with any reasonable conditions or an order
for community-based outpatient treatment under subsection (2)(e) of this
section, the court shall notify the qualified mental health professional who
is conducting the examination of the person's:
1. Prior conditions or any order for community-based outpatient
treatment; and
2. Failure to comply with those conditions or treatment.
(c) The qualified mental health professional who conducts the examination as
described under paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall independently
evaluate the person, considering the person's prior noncompliance, and
certify that he or she meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(d) A person shall not be involuntarily hospitalized based solely on his or her
Page 9 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
failure to comply with conditions or an order for community-based
outpatient treatment.
(4) Following an examination by a qualified mental health professional and a
certification by that professional that the person meets the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization, a judge may order the person hospitalized for a period not to exceed
seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays. For the purposes of this
section, the qualified mental health professional shall be:
(a) A staff member of a regional community program for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(b) An individual qualified and licensed to perform the examination through the
use of telehealth services; or
(c) The psychiatrist ordered, subject to the court's discretion, to perform the
required examination.
(5)[(2)] Any person who has been admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this
section shall be released from the hospital within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding
weekends and holidays, unless further held under the applicable provisions of this
chapter.
(6)[(3)] (a) Any person admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section or
transferred to a hospital while ordered hospitalized under subsection (1) of
this section shall be transported from the person's home county by the sheriff
of that county or other peace officer as ordered by the court.
(b) The sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized
by the peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with
the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the
person to the hospital.
(c) The transportation costs of the sheriff, other peace officer, ambulance service,
or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the
Page 10 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the
cabinet in accordance with[, pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
(7)[(4)] (a) Any person released from the hospital under subsection (2) of this
section shall be transported to the person's county of discharge by a sheriff or
other peace officer, by an ambulance service designated by the cabinet, or by
other appropriate means of transportation which is consistent with the
treatment plan of that person.
(b) The transportation cost of transporting the patient to the patient's county of
discharge when performed by a peace officer, ambulance service, or other
private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in
accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated[issued] by the
cabinet in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
(8)[(5)] A[No] person who has been held under subsection (1) of this section shall not
be held in jail pending evaluation and transportation to the hospital.
(9) A court order under subsection (4) of this section shall expire after thirty (30)
days if not served upon the person subject to the order.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 202A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Upon motion of the county attorney, the hospital shall give notice to the
court and the county attorney if the hospital plans to discharge the
respondent following the certification by a qualified mental health
professional and before the preliminary hearing. Prior to discharge, the
county attorney may make an ex parte motion for a certification review
hearing. The court shall review the ex parte motion upon its receipt.
(b) If the review indicates that the respondent presents an imminent threat of
danger to self, family, or others, the court shall order the qualified mental
health professional to immediately notify the court if the professional has
Page 11 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
certified that the respondent:
1. Is an individual with a mental illness;
2. Presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others as a
result of the mental illness; and
3. Does not meet the other criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(c) The court shall review the certification under paragraph (b) of this
subsection and consider if the respondent has been the subject of
proceedings under this chapter, prior to the current proceeding, and is
exhibiting an escalation of dangerous behavior. After review, the court
may:
1. Order the respondent to be hospitalized in a place designated by the
cabinet until the certification review hearing is held within forty-eight
(48) hours, excluding weekends and holidays;
2. Release the respondent and set the certification review hearing to be
held within forty-eight (48) hours; or
3. Deny the county attorney's motion for a certification review.
(d) At the certification review hearing:
1. The qualified mental health professional that performed the
examination shall testify about the certification under paragraph (b)
of this subsection. This testimony may be given remotely; and
2. The respondent shall be appointed counsel who may present evidence
and cross examine witnesses on the respondent's behalf.
(e) Upon conclusion of the certification review hearing, if the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is an individual with a
mental illness, who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or
others as a result of the mental illness, who may reasonably benefit from
Page 12 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
court-ordered outpatient treatment or release with reasonable conditions,
and for whom court-ordered outpatient treatment or release with reasonable
conditions is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment available, the
court shall order the respondent to:
1. a. Receive community-based outpatient treatment that shall not
exceed three hundred sixty (360) days; and
b. Comply with any other reasonable conditions necessary to
ensure compliance; or
2. Be released with any reasonable conditions necessary to ensure the
safety of self, family, or others and avoid readmittance to a hospital
setting.
(2) (a) Failure to comply with any reasonable conditions or an order for
community-based outpatient treatment under subsection (1)(e) of this
section shall not be grounds to find the person in contempt of court but
shall be prima facie evidence that:
1. The respondent can benefit from inpatient hospitalization; and
2. Inpatient hospitalization is the least restrictive mode of treatment.
(b) If a new petition for involuntary hospitalization is filed within twelve (12)
months due to failure to comply with any reasonable conditions or an order
for community-based outpatient treatment under subsection (1)(e) of this
section, the court shall notify the qualified mental health professional who
is conducting the examination of the respondent's:
1. Prior conditions or any order for community-based outpatient
treatment; and
2. Failure to comply with those conditions or treatment.
(c) The qualified mental health professional who conducts the examination as
described under paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall independently
Page 13 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
evaluate the respondent, considering the respondent's prior noncompliance,
and certify that he or she meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization
under Section 27 of this Act.
(d) A respondent shall not be involuntarily hospitalized based solely on his or
her failure to comply with conditions or an order for community-based
outpatient treatment.
Section 4. KRS 202A.051 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Proceedings for up to sixty (60) days or up to three hundred sixty (360) days of
involuntary hospitalization of an individual shall be initiated by the filing of a
verified petition in District Court.
(2) The petition and all subsequent court documents shall be entitled: "In the interest of
(name of respondent)."
(3) The petition shall be filed by a qualified mental health professional, peace officer,
county attorney, Commonwealth's attorney, spouse, relative, friend, or guardian of
the individual concerning whom the petition is filed, or any responsible adult[other
interested person].
(4) The petition shall set forth:
(a) Petitioner's relationship to the respondent;
(b) Respondent's name, residence, and current location, if known;
(c) The name and residence of respondent's parents, if living and if known, or
respondent's legal guardian, if any and if known;
(d) The name and residence of respondent's husband or wife, if any and if known;
(e) The name and residence of the person having custody of the respondent, if
any, or if no such person is known, the name and residence of a near relative
or that the person is unknown; and
(f) Petitioner's belief, including the factual basis therefor, that the respondent is
an individual with a mental illness[mentally ill] and presents a danger or
Page 14 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
threat of danger to self, family or others if not restrained;[ and]
(g) If the petition seeks a three hundred sixty (360) day involuntary
hospitalization of the respondent, the petition shall further set forth that the
respondent has been hospitalized in a hospital or a forensic psychiatric facility
for a period of thirty (30) days under the provisions of this chapter or KRS
Chapter 504 within the preceding six (6) months; and
(h) Upon request of the county attorney, that the county attorney receives notice
of any discharge by a hospital prior to the preliminary hearing under
subsection (10) of this section.
(5) If the petition seeks a sixty (60) day involuntary hospitalization of the respondent,
the county attorney may motion the court to amend the petition to seek up to a
three hundred sixty (360) day involuntary hospitalization of the individual if the
respondent has been hospitalized in a hospital or a forensic psychiatric facility
for a period of thirty (30) days under the provisions of this chapter or KRS
Chapter 504 within the preceding six (6) months.
(6) Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall examine the petitioner under oath as to
the contents of the petition. If the petitioner is a qualified mental health
professional, the court may dispense with the examination.
(7)[(6)] If after reviewing the allegations contained in the petition and examining the
petitioner under oath, it appears to the court that there is probable cause to believe
the respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized, the court shall, unless either the
court or one (1) of the parties objects, implement the procedures provided in KRS
202A.028 and order the individual to be examined without unnecessary delay by a
qualified mental health professional. If the person is not being hospitalized[held]
under the provisions of this chapter, the court may order that the sheriff of the
county or other peace officer transport the person to a hospital or psychiatric facility
designated by the cabinet for the purpose of the evaluation. The sheriff or other
Page 15 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer,
authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an
ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to a hospital or
psychiatric facility. Following that, the procedures as set forth in KRS 202A.028
shall be carried out. Otherwise, the court shall:
(a) Set a date for a preliminary hearing within six (6) days from the date of
hospitalization of[holding] the person under the provisions of this section,
[section (]excluding holidays and weekends,[)] to determine if there is
probable cause to believe the person should be involuntarily hospitalized;
(b) Notify the respondent, the legal guardian, if any, and if known, and the
spouse, parents, or nearest relative or friend of the respondent concerning the
allegations and contents of the petition and the date and purpose of the
preliminary hearing; and the name, address, and telephone number of the
attorney appointed to represent the respondent; and
(c) Cause the respondent to be examined without unnecessary delay by two (2)
qualified mental health professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician.
The qualified mental health professionals shall certify within twenty-four (24)
hours, [(]excluding weekends and holidays,[)] their findings.
(8)[(7)] (a) If the respondent is being presently hospitalized[held] under the
provisions of this chapter, the court may order further
hospitalization[holding] of the respondent to accomplish the examination
ordered by the court.
(b) If the respondent is not being presently hospitalized[held] under the
provisions of this chapter, the court may order that the sheriff of the county or
a peace officer transport the respondent to a hospital or a psychiatric facility
designated by the cabinet so that the respondent shall be examined without
unnecessary delay by two (2) qualified mental health professionals, at least
Page 16 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
one (1) of whom is a physician. The sheriff or other peace officer may
authorize, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer, the
cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance
service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to a hospital or
psychiatric facility.
(9)[(8)] (a) When the court is authorized to issue an order that the respondent be
transported to a hospital or psychiatric facility, the court may, in its discretion,
issue a summons. A summons so issued shall be directed to the respondent,
shall command the respondent to appear at a time and place [therein ]specified
in the summons where the respondent shall be [there ]examined by two (2)
qualified mental health professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician,
and shall command the respondent's appearance at the preliminary hearing.
(b) If a respondent who has been summoned fails to appear for such examination
or at the preliminary hearing, the court may order that the sheriff of the county
or a peace officer transport the respondent to a hospital or psychiatric facility
designated by the cabinet for the purpose of an evaluation.
(10)[(9)] If upon completion of the preliminary hearing, the court finds:
(a) 1. There is probable cause to believe the respondent should be
involuntarily hospitalized, the court shall order a final hearing within
twenty-one (21) days from the date of hospitalization of[holding] the
respondent under [the provisions of ]this section to determine if the
respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized.
2. If the court finds that probable cause exists under subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph, the county attorney may motion the court at the
conclusion of the preliminary hearing to require that a hearing be
held prior to discharge of a respondent from the hospital. If the court
grants this motion, the hospital shall be required to notify the court
Page 17 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
and the county attorney of the hospital's intent to discharge the
respondent and the court shall conduct the hearing at the earliest
practicable time, consistent with due process and the availability of
counsel, and in no event later than seven (7) days after notice is given
by the hospital, except upon a finding of good cause for further delay.
3. Upon completion of the hearing, if the court finds that the respondent
is an individual with a mental illness, who presents a danger or threat
of danger to self, family, or others as a result of the mental illness,
who may reasonably benefit from court-ordered outpatient treatment
or release with other reasonable conditions, and for whom court-
ordered outpatient treatment or release with other reasonable
conditions is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment
available, the court shall order:
a. For a respondent who meets the criteria for court-ordered
assisted outpatient treatment set forth in Section 13 of this Act:
i. That a treatment plan be developed in accordance with
KRS 202A.0817 within forty-eight (48) hours; and
ii. The respondent to receive court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment under KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831;
b. For any other respondent who may benefit from outpatient
treatment:
i. A qualified mental health professional to develop a
treatment plan within forty-eight (48) hours;
ii. The respondent to receive community-based outpatient
treatment that shall not exceed three hundred sixty (360)
days; and
iii. The respondent to comply with any other reasonable
Page 18 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
conditions necessary to ensure compliance; or
c. The respondent to be released with any reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure the safety of self, family, or others and avoid
readmittance into a hospital setting;
(b) There is no probable cause to believe the respondent should be involuntarily
hospitalized but that the respondent is an individual with a mental illness,
who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others as a
result of the mental illness, who may reasonably benefit from court-ordered
outpatient treatment or release with other reasonable conditions, and for
whom court-ordered outpatient treatment or release with other reasonable
conditions is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment available, the
court shall order:
1. For a respondent who meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted
outpatient treatment set forth in Section 13 of this Act:
a. That a treatment plan be developed in accordance with KRS
202A.0817 within forty-eight (48) hours; and
b. The respondent to receive court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment under KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831;
2. For any other respondent who may benefit from outpatient treatment:
a. A qualified mental health professional to develop a treatment
plan within forty-eight (48) hours;
b. The respondent to receive community-based outpatient treatment
that shall not exceed three hundred sixty (360) days; and
c. The respondent to comply with any other reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure compliance; or
3. The respondent to be released with any reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure the safety of self, family, or others and avoid
Page 19 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
readmittance into a hospital setting; or
(c)[(10)] [If the court finds ]There is no probable cause to believe the respondent:
1. Should be involuntarily hospitalized; or
2. Is an individual with a mental illness:
a. Who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or
others as a result of the mental illness;
b. Who may reasonably benefit from outpatient treatment or
release with reasonable conditions; and
c. For whom outpatient treatment or release with reasonable
conditions is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment
available;[,]
the proceedings against the respondent shall be dismissed, and the respondent
shall be released from any hospitalization[holding].
(11) If upon completion of the final hearing, the court finds:
(a) 1. The respondent should be involuntarily hospitalized, the court shall
order the respondent:
a. Hospitalized in a hospital for a period not to exceed sixty (60)
consecutive days from the date of the court order or a period not to
exceed three hundred sixty (360) consecutive days from the date of
the court order, whatever was the period of time that was requested
in the petition; and
b. To comply with all conditions of the hospital's discharge plan.
2. If the court orders the respondent to be hospitalized under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the county attorney may motion
the court at the conclusion of the final hearing to require that a
hearing be held:
a. Prior to discharge of a respondent from the hospital. If the court
Page 20 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
grants this motion, the hospital shall be required to notify the
court and the county attorney of the hospital's intent to
discharge the respondent and the court shall conduct the hearing
at the earliest practicable time, consistent with due process and
the availability of counsel, and in no event later than seven (7)
days after notice is given by the hospital, except upon a finding
of good cause for further delay; or
b. If the respondent within the past twelve (12) months has been
found incompetent to stand trial in a criminal proceeding and
has not been committed under KRS Chapter 202C in accordance
with Section 9 of this Act.
3. Upon completion of the hearing described in subparagraph 2.a. of this
paragraph, if the court finds that the respondent is an individual with
a mental illness, who presents a danger or threat of danger to self,
family, or others as a result of the mental illness, who may reasonably
benefit from court-ordered outpatient treatment or release with other
reasonable conditions, and for whom court-ordered outpatient
treatment or release with other reasonable conditions is the least
restrictive alternative mode of treatment available, the court shall
order:
a. For a respondent who meets the criteria for court-ordered
assisted outpatient treatment set forth in Section 13 of this Act:
i. That a treatment plan be developed in accordance with
KRS 202A.0817 within forty-eight (48) hours; and
ii. The respondent to receive court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment under KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831;
b. For any other respondent who may benefit from outpatient
Page 21 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
treatment:
i. A qualified mental health professional to develop a
treatment plan within forty-eight (48) hours;
ii. The respondent to receive community-based outpatient
treatment that shall not exceed three hundred sixty (360)
days; and
iii. The respondent to comply with any other reasonable
conditions necessary to ensure compliance; or
c. The respondent to be released with any reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure the safety of self, family, or others and avoid
readmittance into a hospital setting;
(b) The respondent should not be involuntarily hospitalized but that the
respondent is an individual with a mental illness, who presents a danger or
threat of danger to self, family, or others as a result of the mental illness,
who may reasonably benefit from court-ordered outpatient treatment or
release with other reasonable conditions, and for whom court-ordered
outpatient treatment or release with other reasonable conditions is the least
restrictive alternative mode of treatment available, the court shall order:
1. For a respondent who meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted
outpatient treatment set forth in Section 13 of this Act:
a. That a treatment plan be developed in accordance with KRS
202A.0817 within forty-eight (48) hours; and
b. The respondent to receive court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment under KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831;
2. For any other respondent who may benefit from outpatient treatment:
a. A qualified mental health professional to develop a treatment
plan within forty-eight (48) hours;
Page 22 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
b. The respondent to receive community-based outpatient treatment
that shall not exceed three hundred sixty (360) days; and
c. The respondent to comply with any other reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure compliance; or
3. The respondent to be released with any reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure the safety of self, family, or others and avoid
readmittance into a hospital setting; or
(c) The respondent:
1. Should not be involuntary hospitalized; or
2. Is not an individual with a mental illness:
a. Who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or
others as a result of the mental illness;
b. Who may reasonably benefit from outpatient treatment or
release with reasonable conditions; and
c. For whom outpatient treatment or release with reasonable
conditions is the least restrictive mode of treatment available;
the proceedings against the respondent shall be dismissed, and the
respondent shall be released from any hospitalization.
(12) (a) Failure to comply with any reasonable conditions under subsection (10) or
(11) of this section shall not be grounds to find the person in contempt of
court but shall be prima facie evidence that:
1. The person can benefit from inpatient hospitalization; and
2. Inpatient hospitalization is the least restrictive mode of treatment.
(b) If a new petition for involuntary hospitalization is filed within twelve (12)
months due to failure to comply with any reasonable conditions under
subsection (10) or (11) of this section, the court shall notify the qualified
mental health professional who is conducting the examination of the
Page 23 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
person's prior conditions and failure to comply with those conditions.
(c) The qualified mental health professional who conducts the examination as
described under paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall independently
evaluate the person, considering the person's prior noncompliance, and
certify that he or she meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(d) A person shall not be involuntarily hospitalized based solely on his or her
failure to comply with conditions.
(13) Any petition under this section shall expire after thirty (30) days if not served
upon the respondent.
Section 5. KRS 202A.053 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a respondent who has
been ordered involuntarily hospitalized following the preliminary hearing
shall have venue for all subsequent proceedings, including the final hearing,
transferred to the court of the county where the respondent is hospitalized.
(b) A court may order venue be transferred back to the county where the
respondent resides if the court has ordered the respondent to receive
outpatient treatment under Section 4 or 9 of this Act. The receiving county
shall then assume venue and responsibility for the respondent's treatment
plan and supervision, and shall make orders as the court sees fit.
(2) The court of the county where the preliminary hearing was held may, upon its own
motion, or shall, upon motion of one (1) of the parties, retain venue over
proceedings subsequent to the preliminary hearing.
(3) The court of the county where the county attorney has filed a motion for a
certification review hearing under Section 2, 3, or 6 of this Act shall retain venue
over the proceedings.
Section 6. KRS 202A.061 is amended to read as follows:
Page 24 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(1) Prior to completion of an examination by a qualified mental health professional
under this section, the professional shall make a good-faith attempt to contact the
petitioner to obtain any additional relevant information necessary to the petition.
(2) (a) Prior to the completion of an examination under this section, the county
attorney may make an ex parte motion for a certification review hearing.
The court shall review the ex parte motion upon its receipt.
(b) If the review indicates that the person presents an imminent threat of
danger to self, family, or others, the court shall order the qualified mental
health professionals to immediately notify the court if either of the
professionals have certified that the person:
1. Is an individual with mental illness;
2. Presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others as a
result of the mental illness; and
3. Does not meet the other criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(c) The court shall review the certification under paragraph (b) of this
subsection and consider if the person has been the subject of proceedings
under this chapter, prior to the current proceeding, and is exhibiting an
escalation of dangerous behavior. After review, the court may:
1. Order the person to be hospitalized in a place designated by the
cabinet until the certification review hearing is held within forty-eight
(48) hours, excluding weekends and holidays;
2. Release the person and set the certification review hearing to be held
within forty-eight (48) hours; or
3. Deny the county attorney's motion for a certification review.
(d) At the certification review hearing:
1. The qualified mental health professional that performed the
Page 25 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
examination shall testify about the certification under paragraph (b)
of this subsection. This testimony may be given remotely; and
2. The person shall be appointed counsel who may present evidence and
cross examine witnesses on the person's behalf.
(e) Upon conclusion of the certification review hearing, if the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that the person is an individual with a mental
illness, who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family, or others
as a result of the mental illness, who may reasonably benefit from court-
ordered outpatient treatment or release with reasonable conditions, and for
whom court-ordered outpatient treatment or release with reasonable
conditions is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment available, the
court shall order the person to:
1. a. Receive community-based outpatient treatment that shall not
exceed three hundred sixty (360) days; and
b. Comply with any other reasonable conditions necessary to
ensure compliance; or
2. Be released with any reasonable conditions necessary to ensure the
safety of self, family, or others.
(3) (a) Failure to comply with any reasonable conditions or an order for
community-based outpatient treatment under subsection (2)(e) of this
section shall not be grounds to find the person in contempt of court but
shall be prima facie evidence that:
1. The person can benefit from inpatient hospitalization; and
2. Inpatient hospitalization is the least restrictive mode of treatment;
if the person is subject to subsequent proceedings under this chapter within
twelve (12) months.
(b) If a new petition for involuntary hospitalization is filed within the twelve
Page 26 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(12) month period due to failure to comply with any reasonable conditions
or an order for community-based outpatient treatment under subsection
(2)(e) of this section, the court shall notify the qualified mental health
professional who is conducting the examination of the person's:
1. Prior conditions or any order for community-based outpatient
treatment; and
2. Failure to comply with those conditions or treatment.
(c) The qualified mental health professional who conducts the examination as
described under paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall independently
evaluate the person, considering the person's prior noncompliance, and
certify that he or she meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(d) A person shall not be involuntarily hospitalized based solely on his or her
failure to comply with conditions or an order for community-based
outpatient treatment.
(4) (a) In any proceeding for involuntary hospitalization under the applicable
provisions of this chapter, if the criteria for involuntary hospitalization are not
certified by at least two (2) examining qualified mental health professionals,
the court shall, without taking any further action, terminate the proceedings
and order the release of the person.
(b) The qualified mental health professionals shall certify to the court within
twenty-four (24) hours, [(]excluding weekends and holidays,[)] of the
examination, their findings and opinions as to whether the person shall be
involuntarily hospitalized.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 202A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If the court orders community-based outpatient mental health treatment under
Page 27 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
this chapter, the court shall:
(a) Appoint an outpatient provider agency recognized by the cabinet which
shall assemble a multidisciplinary team; and
(b) Report every order for community-based outpatient treatment issued under
this section to the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities.
(2) (a) The multidisciplinary team shall:
1. Regularly monitor the person's adherence to the conditions of the
order and regularly report this information to the court, the county
attorney, respondent's counsel, and any other party the court deems
necessary; and
2. Consist of three (3) mental health professionals, including any of the
following:
a. The respondent's doctor;
b. A nurse practitioner;
c. A prescriber;
d. A therapist;
e. A case manager;
f. A peer support specialist; or
g. Any other person deemed qualified by the court.
(b) Any responsible adult may report nonadherence to the conditions of the
order to the court, the county attorney, respondent's counsel, and any other
party the court deems necessary.
(3) Reports may be provided in written format, in person, or via electronic means, at
the court's discretion.
(4) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A necessary to implement this section.
Page 28 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 202A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person's substantial failure to comply with a court order for community-based
outpatient treatment may constitute presumptive grounds for the court or an
authorized staff physician to order a seventy-two (72) hour emergency admission.
(2) (a) Failure to comply with an order for community-based outpatient treatment
shall not be grounds to find the person in contempt of court but shall be
prima facie evidence that:
1. The person can benefit from inpatient hospitalization; and
2. Inpatient hospitalization is the least restrictive mode of treatment.
(b) If a new petition for involuntary hospitalization is filed within twelve (12)
months due to failure to comply with any order for community-based
outpatient treatment, the court shall notify the qualified mental health
professional who is conducting the examination of the failure to comply.
(3) (a) Any person admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section or
transferred to a hospital while ordered hospitalized under subsection (1) of
this section shall be transported from the person's home county by the
sheriff of that county or other peace officer as ordered by the court.
(b) The sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person
authorized by the peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on
contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet
to transport the person to the hospital.
(c) The transportation costs of the sheriff, other peace officer, ambulance
service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by
the cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by
the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) (a) Any person released from the hospital under subsection (1) of this section
Page 29 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
shall be transported to the person's county of discharge by a sheriff or other
peace officer, by an ambulance service designated by the cabinet, or by
other appropriate means of transportation which is consistent with the
treatment plan of that person.
(b) The transportation cost of transporting the patient to the patient's county of
discharge when performed by a peace officer, ambulance service, or other
private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in
accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 202A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Upon motion of the county attorney under subsection (11)(a)2.b. of Section
4 of this Act, no later than seventy-two (72) hours prior to the request for
early release by a hospital of the period of involuntary hospitalization, the
hospital shall provide a copy of the discharge plan to the court, the county
attorney, and the respondent's counsel of record. The court, upon motion of
the county attorney or the court's own motion, shall conduct a review
hearing to determine if the discharge plan gives the respondent a realistic
opportunity to avoid imminent readmittance into an inpatient psychiatric
hospital for treatment.
(b) This hearing shall only be conducted for a respondent who within the past
twelve (12) months has been found incompetent to stand trial in a criminal
proceeding and has not been committed under KRS Chapter 202C.
(2) The court shall verify that discharge planning procedures were completed to give
the respondent a realistic opportunity to avoid recurrence of substantial symptom
burden that would necessitate psychiatric hospitalization. Those procedures shall
include but not be limited to any of the following:
Page 30 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(a) Documenting the housing status of the respondent or that housing services
were offered and the respondent declined;
(b) Scheduling an outpatient treatment appointment for no later than seven (7)
days after discharge;
(c) Providing or prescribing a thirty (30) day supply of medication;
(d) Documenting a transportation plan that may include securing a bus pass,
taxi voucher, or an acknowledgment that the respondent will walk or the
respondent's family will provide transportation;
(e) Developing and documenting a crisis plan with contact information for
services that are available twenty-four (24) hours a day;
(f) Developing a transfer of care plan or attempting to develop a transfer of
care plan with the respondent if the respondent has met with an outpatient
provider or an appointment with the outpatient provider has been
scheduled; or
(g) Contacting the respondent's family or other support systems, if the
respondent consents.
(3) For respondents with decision-making capacity who refuse housing or other
services under subsection (2) of this section, the discharge plan shall document:
(a) That housing and other services were offered and explained;
(b) The respondent's reasons for refusal;
(c) That the respondent understands the potential consequences of his or her
choices;
(d) That risk reduction strategies were offered, including access to crisis
contacts, mobile crisis services, drop-in services, and other safety-oriented
resources; and
(e) That there is a plan for periodic outreach to offer services.
(4) If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the discharge plan does
Page 31 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
not give the respondent a realistic opportunity to avoid imminent readmittance
into an inpatient psychiatric hospital for treatment, then the respondent shall not
be discharged and the court shall order the hospital to submit within seventy-two
(72) hours a revised discharge plan that gives the respondent a realistic
opportunity to avoid imminent readmittance into an inpatient psychiatric hospital
for treatment.
(5) (a) If a respondent is not discharged under subsection (4) of this section, a
review hearing shall be conducted by the court within seven (7) days of the
hospital's submission of a revised discharge plan.
(b) A review hearing may be conducted in an informal manner, consistent with
orderly procedures, and in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful
effect on the mental or physical health of the respondent. The hearing may
be held by the court in chambers, remotely from a hospital, or in another
suitable place. The respondent shall be present in person or remotely for all
review hearings, unless presence is waived by the respondent through
counsel.
(c) 1. The Commonwealth shall present evidence regarding whether:
a. The respondent continues to meet the criteria for involuntary
commitment under Section 27 of this Act; and
b. The discharge plan gives the respondent a realistic opportunity
to avoid imminent readmittance into an inpatient psychiatric
hospital for treatment.
2. The respondent shall be afforded an opportunity to present evidence
and to cross-examine any witnesses.
(d) The Kentucky Rules of Evidence shall apply and proceedings shall be heard
by a judge without a jury.
(e) The respondent's right to this hearing shall not be waived.
Page 32 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(f) 1. At the conclusion of a review hearing, the court shall make written
findings of fact concerning whether:
a. The criteria for involuntary commitment under Section 27 of this
Act continue to be satisfied; and
b. The discharge plan gives the respondent a realistic opportunity
to avoid imminent readmittance into an inpatient psychiatric
hospital for treatment.
2. If the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the criteria
continue to be satisfied and that the discharge plan does not give the
respondent a realistic opportunity to avoid imminent readmittance into
an inpatient psychiatric hospital for treatment, the court shall enter an
order authorizing the continued care and treatment of the respondent
until the expiration of the order under subsection (11)(a) of Section 4
of this Act.
3. If the court does not make the finding required in subparagraph 2. of
this paragraph, the court shall discharge the respondent to comply
with the discharge plan unless the court finds that the respondent is
an individual with a mental illness, who presents a danger or threat of
danger to self, family, or others as a result of the mental illness, who
may reasonably benefit from court-ordered outpatient treatment or
release with other reasonable conditions, and for whom court-ordered
outpatient treatment or release with other reasonable conditions is the
least restrictive alternative mode of treatment available, in which case
the court shall discharge the respondent and may order:
a. For a respondent who meets the criteria for court-ordered
assisted outpatient treatment set forth in Section 13 of this Act:
i. That at a treatment plan be developed in accordance with
Page 33 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
Section 13 of this Act within forty-eight (48) hours; and
ii. The respondent to receive court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment under KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831;
b. For any other respondent who may benefit from outpatient
treatment:
i. A qualified mental health professional to develop a
treatment plan within forty-eight (48) hours;
ii. The respondent to receive community-based outpatient
treatment that shall not exceed three hundred sixty (360)
days; and
iii. The respondent to comply with any other reasonable
condition necessary to ensure compliance; or
c. The respondent to be released with any reasonable conditions
necessary to ensure the safety of self, family, or others and avoid
readmittance into a hospital setting.
(6) The Commonwealth, respondent, or hospital where the respondent is being
hospitalized may make a motion for an additional review hearing if a material
change in circumstances has occurred and the respondent no longer meets the
criteria for involuntary hospitalization under Section 27 of this Act. If the court
has probable cause to believe that a material change in circumstances has
occurred, the court shall:
(a) Conduct a review hearing within fourteen (14) days of the filing of the
motion for an additional review hearing; and
(b) Order the respondent to be evaluated as described under subsection (5)(b) of
this section.
(7) (a) Any respondent being hospitalized under this section shall be transferred to
an inpatient psychiatric hospital owned by the Commonwealth upon request
Page 34 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
of the hospital or psychiatric facility where the respondent is being held.
(b) An inpatient psychiatric hospital contracted with the cabinet shall not
request transfer under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 202A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) By October 1 of each year beginning in 2027, the cabinet in coordination with the
Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and
the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary a report that includes:
(a) The number of:
1. Petitions filed under Section 4 of this Act;
2. Petitions filed under Section 12 of this Act;
3. Court orders for seventy-two (72) hour hospital admission;
4. Petitions dismissed prior to a final order under Section 4 of this Act or
KRS 202A.0819;
5. Petitions that result in an order for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 4 of this Act and if the orders were for sixty (60) days or three
hundred sixty (360) days of involuntary hospitalization;
6. Petitions that result in an order for outpatient treatment or any other
reasonable conditions;
7. Petitions filed following a respondent's violation of court-ordered
outpatient treatment or other reasonable conditions;
8. Precertification review hearings conducted under this chapter;
9. Discharge hearings conducted under Section 4 of this Act; and
10. Review hearings conducted under Section 9 of this Act;
(b) The stage of a proceeding under this chapter where a:
1. Petition is dismissed; and
Page 35 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
2. Court has ordered a respondent to court-ordered outpatient or any
other reasonable conditions;
(c) The length of time a respondent receives treatment under this chapter prior
to discharge by a hospital or termination of an order to receive outpatient
treatment; and
(d) A summary of the services provided to a respondent who is ordered to
involuntary hospitalization or to receive outpatient treatment.
(2) Any hospital, qualified mental health professional, and any other mental health
agency who evaluates or treats a respondent under this chapter shall be required
to report data to the cabinet as required under this section. The cabinet shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
implement this section.
(3) The cabinet and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall enter into an
agreement to share data necessary to prepare the report required under this
section.
(4) The report prepared under this section shall not identify specific individuals.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 202A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In any proceeding under this chapter, if the respondent agrees:
(a) To comply with a treatment plan; and
(b) That he or she meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act, except that outpatient treatment is the least restrictive
mode of treatment; and
upon agreement of the court, county attorney, respondent, respondent's counsel,
and qualified mental health professional, the court may enter a consent order for
the respondent to receive court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment or
community-based outpatient treatment and order other reasonable conditions.
Page 36 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(2) An order entered under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Be filed with the court and made a part of the record in the proceeding;
(b) Specify the terms and conditions of treatment to which the respondent has
agreed to;
(c) Specify that the respondent is subject to same monitoring, reporting, and
review requirements as any contested order to receive court-ordered assisted
outpatient treatment or community-based outpatient treatment;
(d) Remain in effect for a period not to exceed three hundred sixty (360) days,
subject to early termination or modification by the court.
(3) The failure of a respondent to comply with a consent order entered under this
section shall be treated in the same manner as noncompliance with a contested
order under this chapter.
Section 12. KRS 202A.0811 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Proceedings for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment of a person shall be
initiated by the filing of a verified petition for that purpose in District Court.
(2) The petition and all subsequent court documents shall be entitled: "In the interest of
(name of respondent)."
(3) The petition shall be filed by a qualified mental health professional; peace officer;
county attorney; Commonwealth's attorney; spouse, relative, friend, or guardian of
the person concerning whom the petition is filed; or any responsible adult[other
interested person].
(4) The petition shall set forth:
(a) Petitioner's relationship to the respondent;
(b) Respondent's name, residence, and current location, if known;
(c) Petitioner's belief, including the factual basis therefor, that the respondent
meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment as set forth in
KRS 202A.0817; and
Page 37 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(d) Whether, within five (5) days prior to the filing of the petition, the respondent
has been evaluated by a qualified mental health professional to determine
whether the respondent meets the criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment pursuant to KRS 202A.0815.
(5) Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall examine the petitioner under oath as to
the contents of the petition. If the petitioner is a qualified mental health
professional, the court may dispense with the examination.
(6) If, after reviewing the allegations contained in the petition and examining the
petitioner under oath, it appears to the court that there is probable cause to believe
the respondent should be court-ordered to assisted outpatient treatment, the court
shall:
(a) Order the respondent to be evaluated without unnecessary delay by a qualified
mental health professional to determine whether the respondent meets the
criteria for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment set forth in KRS
202A.0815, unless the court has already received the certified findings of such
an evaluation conducted no earlier than five (5) days prior to the filing of the
petition. The qualified mental health professional shall certify his or her
findings to the court within seventy-two (72) hours from receipt of the order,
excluding weekends and holidays; and
(b) Set a date for a hearing within six (6) days from the date of the filing of the
petition under the provisions of this section, excluding weekends and
holidays, to determine if the respondent should be court-ordered to assisted
outpatient treatment.
(7) If the court finds there is no probable cause to believe the respondent should be
court-ordered to assisted outpatient treatment, the proceedings against the
respondent shall be dismissed.
Section 13. KRS 202A.0815 is amended to read as follows:
Page 38 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
A[No] person shall not be court-ordered to assisted outpatient mental health treatment
unless the person:
(1) Is diagnosed with a serious mental illness;
(2) Has a history of repeated nonadherence with mental health treatment, which has:
(a) At least twice within the last forty-eight (48) months, been a significant factor
in necessitating hospitalization or arrest of the person; or
(b) Within the last twenty-four (24) months, resulted in an act, threat, or attempt
at serious physical injury to self or others;
(3) Is unlikely to adequately adhere to outpatient treatment on a voluntary basis
based on a qualified mental health professional's [:
(a) ]clinical observation[; and
(b) Identification of specific characteristics of the person's clinical condition that
significantly impair the person's ability to make and maintain a rational and
informed decision as to whether to engage in outpatient treatment
voluntarily]; and
(4) Is in need of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment as the least restrictive
alternative mode of treatment presently available and appropriate.
Section 14. KRS 202A.0819 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At a hearing and at all stages of a proceeding for court-ordered assisted outpatient
treatment, the respondent shall be:
(a) Represented by counsel;
(b) Accompanied by a peer support specialist or other person in a support
relationship, if requested by the respondent; and
(c) Afforded an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses on his or her
behalf, and cross-examine adverse witnesses.
(2) If a respondent does not appear at the hearing, and appropriate attempts to elicit the
respondent's appearance have failed, the court may conduct the hearing in the
Page 39 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
respondent's absence.
(3) A qualified mental health professional who recommends court-ordered assisted
outpatient treatment for the respondent shall:
(a) Testify at the hearing, in person or via electronic means;
(b) State the facts and clinical determinations which support the allegation that
the respondent meets the criteria stated in KRS 202A.0815; and
(c) Testify in support of the treatment plan provided pursuant to KRS 202A.0817,
and for each category of proposed evidence-based treatment, he or she shall
state the specific recommendation and the clinical basis for his or her belief
that such treatment is essential to the maintenance of the respondent's health
or safety.
(4) If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court does not find by clear and
convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria stated in KRS
202A.0815, the court shall deny the petition and the proceedings against the
respondent shall be dismissed.
(5) If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court finds by clear and convincing
evidence that the respondent meets the criteria stated in KRS 202A.0815, the court
may order the respondent to receive assisted outpatient treatment for a period of
time not to exceed three hundred sixty (360) days and to comply with any other
reasonable conditions necessary to ensure compliance. The court's order shall
incorporate a treatment plan, which shall be limited in scope to the
recommendations included in the treatment plan provided by the qualified mental
health professional pursuant to KRS 202A.0817.
(6) The court shall report every order for assisted outpatient treatment issued under this
section to the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
Section 15. KRS 202A.0823 is amended to read as follows:
Page 40 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(1) A person's substantial failure to comply with a court order for assisted outpatient
treatment may constitute presumptive grounds for the court or an authorized staff
physician to order a seventy-two (72) hour emergency admission[ pursuant to KRS
202A.031].
(2) (a) Upon the refusal of a person subject to a court order for assisted outpatient
treatment to participate in any or all aspects of his or her treatment plan,
the person's outpatient provider may establish a review committee that is
made up of three (3) qualified mental health professionals to examine the
appropriateness of the person's treatment plan. Within three (3) days of the
refusal, the review committee shall meet the person and his or her counsel
or other representative to discuss its recommendations.
(b) If the person still refuses to participate in any or all aspects of his or her
treatment plan, the person's outpatient provider may petition the District
Court for a de novo determination of the appropriateness of the proposed
treatment.
(c) Within seven (7) days, the court shall conduct a hearing, consistent with the
person's rights to due process of law, and shall utilize the following factors
in reaching its determination:
1. Whether the treatment is necessary to protect the person or others
from harm;
2. Whether the person is incapable of giving informed consent to the
proposed treatment;
3. Whether any less restrictive alternative treatment exists; and
4. Whether the proposed treatment carries any risk of permanent side
effects.
(d) Upon completion of the hearing, the court shall enter an appropriate
judgment.
Page 41 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(e) A judgment entered under paragraph (d) of this subsection may extend to
treatment provided during a seventy-two (72) hour emergency admission.
(3) (a) Failure to comply with an order for assisted outpatient treatment shall not be
grounds to find the person in contempt of court but shall be prima facie
evidence that:
1. The person can benefit from inpatient hospitalization; and
2. Inpatient hospitalization is the least restrictive mode of treatment.
(b) If a new petition for involuntary hospitalization is filed within twelve (12)
months due to failure to comply with any order for assisted outpatient
treatment, the court shall notify the qualified mental health professional
who is conducting the examination of the person's:
1. Prior order for assisted outpatient treatment; and
2. Failure to comply with assisted outpatient treatment.
(c) The qualified mental health professional who conducts the examination as
described under paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall independently
evaluate the person, considering the person's prior noncompliance, and
certify that he or she meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization under
Section 27 of this Act.
(d) A person shall not be involuntarily hospitalized based solely on his or her
failure to comply with an order for assisted outpatient treatment.
(4) (a) Any person admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section or
transferred to a hospital while ordered hospitalized under subsection (1) of
this section shall be transported from the person's home county by the
sheriff of that county or other peace officer as ordered by the court.
(b) The sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person
authorized by the peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on
contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet
Page 42 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
to transport the person to the hospital.
(c) The transportation costs of the sheriff, other peace officer, ambulance
service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by
the cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by
the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) (a) Any person released from the hospital under subsection (1) of this section
shall be transported to the person's county of discharge by a sheriff or other
peace officer, by an ambulance service designated by the cabinet, or by
other appropriate means of transportation which is consistent with the
treatment plan of that person.
(b) The transportation cost of transporting the patient to the patient's county of
discharge when performed by a peace officer, ambulance service, or other
private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in
accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
Section 16. KRS 202A.091 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court records of a respondent made in all proceedings pursuant to this[KRS]
chapter [202A ]are hereby declared to be confidential and shall not be open to the
general public for inspection except when such disclosure is provided in KRS
202A.016.
(2) Following the discharge of a respondent from a treatment facility or the issuance of
a court order denying a petition for a commitment, a respondent may at any time
move to have all court records pertaining to the proceedings expunged from the
files of the court. The county attorney shall be given notice of the[any such] motion
and shall have five (5) days in which to respond to the motion[same] or request a
hearing on the motion[thereon].
(3) (a) Any petitioner under Section 4 of this Act who qualifies as a responsible
Page 43 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
party under KRS 311.631 may motion the court to participate in court
proceedings and be informed by a hospital of the discharge plan prior to a
respondent's release under this chapter, except for any confidential
therapeutic communication or any other medical records.
(b) The court may enter a written order allowing the petitioner to participate as
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless the court finds the
petitioner's participation is not in the best interests of the respondent.
(4) Any person seeking information contained in the court files or the court records of
proceedings involving persons under this chapter may file a written motion in the
cause setting out why the information is needed. A District Judge may issue an
order to disclose the information sought if he or she finds the[such] order is
appropriate under the circumstances and if he or she finds it is in the best interest of
the person or of the public to have the[such] information disclosed.
Section 17. KRS 202A.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court which orders any person to the receiving hospital or psychiatric facility,
under the provisions of this chapter[,] shall immediately[at once] notify the
receiving hospital or psychiatric facility that the[such] order has been made,
advising of the sex and condition of the person.
(2) After the facility has been [so ]notified, the court shall order the sheriff of the
county or other peace officer to transport the patient within forty-eight (48) hours,
[(]excluding weekends and holidays,[)] from the county in which the person is
located to the hospital or psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet. The sheriff
or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace
officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an
ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to the hospital.
(3) The transportation costs of transporting a person to a hospital or psychiatric facility,
when performed by a peace officer, an ambulance service, or other private agency
Page 44 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in accordance with
administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet under the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13A.
(4) In returning any patient to the county from which the patient is sent, the
transportation cost of the sheriff or other peace officer, the ambulance service, or
the other agency on contract with the cabinet transporting the patient shall be paid
as provided in KRS 202A.028(5)[(4)], when necessary.
(5) Whenever an individual is involuntarily hospitalized by a court order the patient
shall be transported to the hospital designated by the cabinet and accompanied by
the following documents:
(a) A copy of the petition for involuntary hospitalization, unless hospitalization
takes place pursuant to KRS 202A.041 or Section 8 or 15 of this Act;
(b) The certificate of qualified mental health professionals, if any; and
(c) The order of involuntary hospitalization.
(6) The hospital may refuse to receive any person who has been ordered to be
involuntarily hospitalized by a court order if the papers presented with the[such]
person at the hospital do not comply with the provisions of this chapter or if it does
not receive notification of the order of involuntary hospitalization as required by
this chapter.
Section 18. KRS 202A.171 is amended to read as follows:
Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, an authorized staff physician of a hospital
shall discharge an involuntary patient when he no longer meets the criteria for
involuntary hospitalization.
Section 19. KRS 202C.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Cabinet" means the [Kentucky ]Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) "Commitment hearing" means the hearing under KRS 202C.040 to determine if a
Page 45 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
respondent meets the criteria for involuntary commitment under this chapter;
(3) "Danger" means substantial physical harm or threat of substantial physical harm
upon self or others;
(4) "Evidentiary hearing" means the hearing under KRS 202C.030 to determine if the
respondent is responsible for[defendant committed] the qualifying offense for
which he or she was charged by a preponderance of the evidence;
(5) "Forensic psychiatric facility" means a mental institution or facility, or part thereof,
designated by the secretary for the purpose and function of providing inpatient
evaluation, care, and treatment for [mentally ill persons or ]individuals with an
intellectual disability or mental illness who have been charged with or convicted of
a felony;
(6) "Hospital" means:
(a) A state mental hospital or institution or other licensed public or private
hospital, institution, health-care facility, or part thereof, approved by the
cabinet[Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services] as equipped to
provide full-time residential care and treatment for [mentally ill persons or
]individuals with an intellectual disability or mental illness; or
(b) A hospital, institution, or health-care facility of the government of the United
States equipped to provide residential care and treatment for [mentally ill
persons or ]individuals with an intellectual disability or mental illness;
(7) "Individual with a mental illness" means a person with substantially impaired
capacity to use self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of the person's
affairs and social relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized
emotional symptoms where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or
emotional symptoms can be related to physiological, psychological, or social
factors;
(8) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means a person with significantly
Page 46 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in
adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental period;
(9)[(8)] "Judge" means the judge who found the respondent incompetent to stand trial
in the criminal proceeding from which the petition for involuntary commitment
arose;
(10)[(9)] "Less restrictive alternative mode of treatment" means a treatment given
outside of a forensic psychiatric facility which would provide a respondent with
appropriate treatment or care consistent with accepted professional practice
standards and protect the respondent's safety and the safety of others;[
(10) "Mentally ill person" means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use
self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of the person's affairs and social
relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms
where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be
related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;]
(11) "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the performance of official duties;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the practice of official duties, who is certified or eligible to apply
for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
(c) A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological
practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate, licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A licensed registered nurse with a master's degree in psychiatric nursing from
an accredited institution and two (2) years of clinical experience with
Page 47 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
individuals with a mental illness[mentally ill persons], or a licensed
registered nurse, with a bachelor's degree in nursing from an accredited
institution, who is certified as a psychiatric and mental health nurse by the
American Nurses Association and who has three (3) years of inpatient or
outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric nursing and is currently employed
by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or
a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a private agency or company
engaged in the provision of mental health services or a regional community
program for mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic
psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of
mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit
of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health
and individuals with an intellectual disability;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS Chapter
335.500 to 335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
Page 48 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit
of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health
and individuals with an intellectual disability; or
(h) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one
(1) of the following requirements:
1. Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric
residency program for physician assistants;
2. Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience
under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a
psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American
Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
3. Holds a master's degree from a physician assistant program accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is
practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840,
and:
a. Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least two (2) years; or
4. Holds a bachelor's degree, possesses a current physician assistant
certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under
Page 49 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:
a. Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least three (3) years;
(12) "Qualifying offense" means a capital offense, a Class A felony, a Class B felony
resulting in death or serious physical injury, or a violation of KRS 510.040 or
510.070;
(13) "Respondent" means a person who was a criminal defendant found incompetent to
stand trial who is or was the subject of a petition for involuntary commitment filed
under KRS Chapter 504;
(14) "Review hearing" means any hearing conducted to determine if a respondent
continues to meet the criteria for involuntary commitment after the initial order for
involuntary commitment has been issued under this chapter; and
(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
Section 20. KRS 202C.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a defendant who is charged with a qualifying offense has been found, after a
hearing under KRS Chapter 504, to be incompetent to stand trial with no substantial
probability that the defendant will attain competency within three hundred sixty
(360) days, the Commonwealth's attorney's office serving the county of criminal
prosecution shall immediately petition the Circuit Court that found the defendant
incompetent to stand trial or, if the finding was by a District Court, the Circuit
Court in the county of the criminal prosecution, for an involuntary commitment
Page 50 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
proceeding, to include an evidentiary hearing and a commitment hearing, if
applicable, under this chapter.
(2) (a) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall assign a guardian ad litem to
represent the [needs and ]best interest of the respondent, independent of the
respondent's defense attorney.
(b) The guardian ad litem shall:
1. Be a full and active participant in all proceedings other than the
evidentiary hearing under KRS 202C.030. At the evidentiary hearing,
the guardian ad litem's role shall be limited to assisting the respondent
with decision-making related to the hearing, including but not limited
to whether to waive the hearing, whether to stipulate to the allegations,
and whether to testify. The guardian ad litem shall not act as an
attorney advocate at the evidentiary hearing;[ and shall]
2. Independently investigate, assess, and advocate for the
respondent's[defendant's] best interest;[. The guardian ad litem is]
3. Not be a replacement for the respondent's defense attorney; and
4. Be paid an hourly rate not to exceed the maximum hourly rate
provided in the Legal Services Duties and Maximum Rate Schedule
promulgated by the Government Contract Review Committee
established pursuant to KRS 45A.705, to be paid by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
(c) If the respondent[defendant] has retained or been appointed a defense
attorney in the criminal case, that attorney may continue to represent the
respondent[defendant] in proceedings under this chapter. If, at any time
during the pendency of proceedings under this chapter, the
respondent[defendant] is not represented by an attorney, the court shall
appoint counsel for the respondent[defendant], without a showing of
Page 51 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
indigency, to be provided by the Department of Public Advocacy or its
designee.
(3) The Circuit Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings under this
chapter.
(4) The Circuit Court in the county of the criminal prosecution shall retain
jurisdiction over all proceedings under this chapter until the respondent is
discharged.
Section 21. KRS 202C.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An adversarial evidentiary hearing on the record shall be held within forty-five
(45)[twenty (20)] days, excluding weekends and holidays, of the filing of a petition
pursuant to KRS 202C.020, unless the court orders a later hearing for good cause
shown. Appropriate notice shall be served on all parties. The court shall order the
Commonwealth to provide all available discovery to the respondent no later than
seven (7) days, excluding weekends and holidays, before the hearing, unless the
court orders a later date for good cause shown. [No ]Evidence that has not been
disclosed through discovery shall not[may] be presented at the hearing[ that has
not been disclosed through discovery].
(2) The respondent may stipulate to potential responsibility[guilt] and waive the
hearing. A stipulation of potential responsibility shall not[guilt cannot] be used
against the respondent in any future criminal prosecution or civil litigation.
(3) (a) The purpose of the evidentiary hearing shall be to determine whether
sufficient evidence exists to support a finding that the respondent is
responsible for[guilty of] the charged crime against him or her.
(b) The Commonwealth's attorney's office serving the county of criminal
prosecution shall have the burden of proving the sufficiency of the evidence
by a preponderance of the evidence.
(4) The evidentiary hearing shall be held before a judge without a jury. The rules of
Page 52 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
evidence shall apply. The respondent shall be permitted to present evidence and
cross examine witnesses. The respondent may present evidence of affirmative
defenses that could be raised at a criminal trial on the charged crime, except for the
defense of insanity. The Commonwealth shall not have the burden of disproving an
affirmative defense. The respondent must prove an affirmative defense by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(5) (a) If the court determines that sufficient evidence has been presented to support a
finding that the respondent is responsible for[guilty of] the charged crime
against him or her, the court shall immediately schedule a commitment
hearing under this chapter to be held within forty-five (45)[twenty (20)] days,
unless the court orders a later hearing for good cause shown, excluding
weekends and holidays.
(b) 1. The court shall cause the respondent to be examined without
unnecessary delay by two (2) qualified mental health professionals, at
least one (1) of whom is a physician. The qualified mental health
professionals shall, no fewer than[within] seven (7) days, excluding
weekends and holidays, prior to the hearing, certify to the court their
findings as to whether the respondent meets the criteria for involuntarily
commitment under KRS 202C.050.
2. A copy of the findings submitted under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph shall be sent to the Commonwealth, the respondent's
attorney of record, the respondent's guardian ad litem, and all other
parties of record.
(6) If the court determines that insufficient evidence has been presented to support a
finding that the respondent is responsible for[guilty of] the charged crime against
him or her, the court shall order the immediate release of the respondent.
(7) Any[No] evidence or statement submitted by the respondent at the evidentiary
Page 53 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
hearing shall not be admissible in any criminal prosecution or civil litigation.
Section 22. KRS 202C.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A commitment hearing shall be held within forty-five (45)[twenty (20)] days,
unless the court orders a later hearing for good cause shown, excluding weekends
and holidays, after the court finds that the evidence presented in an evidentiary
hearing pursuant to KRS 202C.030 supports a finding that the respondent is
responsible for[guilty of] the charged crime against him or her by a preponderance
of the evidence.
(2) The commitment hearing may be conducted in an informal manner, consistent with
orderly procedures, and in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect on
the mental or physical health of the respondent. The hearing may be held by the
court in chambers, at a forensic psychiatric facility, or other suitable place.
(3) (a) The Commonwealth's attorney's office serving the county of criminal
prosecution which led to the finding that the respondent was incompetent to
stand trial shall present evidence regarding whether the respondent meets the
criteria for involuntary commitment under KRS 202C.050.
(b) The respondent [and the respondent's guardian ad litem ]shall be afforded an
opportunity to testify, and the respondent's counsel shall conduct the
hearing on the respondent's behalf to present evidence[,] and to cross-
examine any witnesses.
(c) The respondent's guardian ad litem shall participate in the proceeding in a
best-interest, friend-of-the-court capacity and may submit independent
recommendations to the court or jury, if a jury has been requested,
regarding the respondent's best interest.
(4) The manner of proceeding and the rules of evidence shall be the same as those in
any criminal proceeding. The standard of proof shall be proof beyond a reasonable
doubt. Proceedings shall be heard by the judge unless a party or the guardian ad
Page 54 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
litem requests a jury.
(5) The respondent's right to the commitment hearing shall not be waived.
Section 23. KRS 202C.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] respondent shall not be involuntarily committed under this chapter unless
there is a determination that:
(a) The respondent presents, or would present if released, a danger to self or
others as a result of his or her mental condition; and
(b) [The respondent needs care, training, or treatment in order to mitigate or
prevent substantial physical harm to self or others;
(c) The respondent has a demonstrated history or recent manifestation of criminal
behavior that has endangered or caused injury to others or has a substantial
history of involuntary hospitalizations under KRS Chapter 202A or 202B
prior to the commission of the charged crime; or
(d) ]A presently available less restrictive alternative mode of treatment would
endanger the safety of the respondent or others.
(2) When a respondent is involuntarily committed under this chapter, the cabinet shall
place that respondent in a forensic psychiatric facility designated by the secretary.
Section 24. KRS 202C.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A review hearing to determine if a respondent involuntarily committed under
this chapter should remain in a forensic psychiatric facility shall be conducted
by the court that issued the initial order in accordance with[according to the
provisions of] subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) If at any point during the respondent's placement at a forensic psychiatric
facility it appears that the respondent no longer meets the criteria for
involuntary commitment under KRS 202C.050 because there has been a
material change in circumstances or there is new evidence to present, the
respondent or the respondent's guardian ad litem may request a review hearing
Page 55 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
pursuant to this section.
(2) The schedule for review hearings shall be as follows:
(a) From the initial order of commitment, a [standard ]review hearing shall be
conducted no earlier[not sooner] than ninety (90) days and no[not] later than
one hundred twenty (120) days; and
(b) After the review hearing under paragraph (a) of this subsection, review
hearings shall be conducted not less than once every two (2) years unless a
review hearing has been requested under subsection (1)(b) of this
section[For the first two (2) years after the initial order of commitment,
standard review hearings shall be conducted not less than one hundred eighty
(180) days and not more than two hundred ten (210) days from the most
recent review;
(c) Beginning two (2) years after the initial order of commitment, a standard
review hearing shall be conducted not more than three hundred sixty-five
(365) days from the most recent review hearing; and
(d) A heightened review hearing shall be conducted not more than five (5) years
from the initial order of commitment and, thereafter, not more than five (5)
years from the most recent heightened review hearing].
(3) (a) Prior to each [standard ]review hearing, the court shall cause the respondent to
be examined without unnecessary delay by two (2) qualified mental health
professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician. The qualified mental
health professionals shall, no fewer than[within] seven (7) days prior to the
hearing, excluding weekends and holidays, certify to the court their findings
as to whether the respondent meets the criteria for involuntarily commitment
under KRS 202C.050.
(b) 1. In addition to the examinations required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the respondent shall undergo evaluations of competency at
Page 56 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
least once every two (2) years to be conducted at a forensic psychiatric
facility.
2. Upon a finding by the forensic psychiatric facility that the
respondent's competency has been restored, the forensic psychiatric
facility shall provide written notice of restoration to the court, the
Commonwealth, the respondent's attorney of record, the respondent's
guardian ad litem, and all other parties of record within ten (10) days
of the determination of restoration.
3. Upon receipt of the notice of restoration of the respondent's
competency, a status conference shall be held within thirty (30) days,
unless the court orders a later hearing for good cause shown.
(4) A [standard ]review hearing may be conducted in an informal manner, consistent
with orderly procedures, and in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect
on the mental or physical health of the respondent. The hearing may be held by the
court in chambers, [or ]remotely from a forensic psychiatric facility, or in
another[other] suitable place. The respondent shall be present in person or remotely
for all review hearings, unless presence is waived by the respondent through
counsel.
(5) (a) The Commonwealth's attorney's office serving the county of criminal
prosecution which led to finding that the respondent was incompetent to stand
trial shall present evidence regarding whether the respondent[ remains
incompetent to stand trial and] continues to meet the criteria for involuntary
commitment under KRS 202C.050.
(b) The respondent, through counsel, [and the respondent's guardian ad litem
]shall be afforded an opportunity to present evidence, and to cross-examine
any witnesses.
(c) The respondent's guardian ad litem shall be permitted to participate in the
Page 57 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
review hearing in a best-interest, friend-of-the-court capacity and may
submit independent recommendations to the court regarding the
respondent's best interest.
(6) The manner of proceeding and the rules of evidence shall be the same as those in
any criminal proceeding. The standard of proof shall be proof beyond a reasonable
doubt. Proceedings shall be heard by a judge without a jury[, except that a
respondent shall be entitled to a jury upon request if the respondent has not had a
review hearing with a jury during the preceding twelve (12) months].
(7) The respondent's right to this hearing shall not be waived.
(8) At the conclusion of a [standard ]review hearing, the court shall make written
findings of fact concerning whether the criteria for involuntary commitment under
KRS 202C.050 continue to be satisfied based upon proof beyond a reasonable
doubt. If the court finds that the criteria continue to be satisfied, the court shall enter
an order authorizing the continued care and treatment of the respondent at the
forensic psychiatric facility. Otherwise, the court shall enter an order requiring the
respondent to be discharged.[
(9) During a heightened review hearing, the procedures of a standard review hearing
shall apply. Additionally, the qualified mental health professionals who evaluated
the respondent in preparation for the hearing shall be required to give live testimony
and answer questions before the court. The respondent shall be physically present in
the courtroom for the hearing. If the respondent is unable to attend for any reason,
the hearing shall be rescheduled to a time, place, and manner in which the
respondent is able to attend.]
Section 25. KRS 202C.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Forensic psychiatric facilities ordered to receive an involuntarily committed
respondent shall have standing to petition the Circuit Court for any necessary
clarification or modification of orders or judgments entered in proceedings under
Page 58 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
this chapter and to appeal from final judgments or orders entered in proceedings
which have not complied with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A copy of any motions filed under subsection (1) of this section shall be sent to
the involuntarily committed respondent, the respondent's guardian ad litem, [and
]the respondent's attorney of record, the Commonwealth, and all other parties of
record[ of whatever pleadings are filed by the hospital].
Section 26. KRS 202A.014 is amended to read as follows:
All proceedings for the involuntary hospitalization of individuals with a mental
illness[mentally ill persons] shall be initiated in the District Court of the county where the
person to be hospitalized resides or in which he may be at the time of the filing of a
petition.
Section 27. KRS 202A.026 is amended to read as follows:
A[No] person shall not be involuntarily hospitalized unless the[such] person is an
individual with a mental illness[a mentally ill person]:
(1) Who presents a danger or threat of danger to self, family or others as a result of the
mental illness;
(2) Who can reasonably benefit from treatment; and
(3) For whom hospitalization is the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment
presently available.
Section 28. KRS 202A.231 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a certificate of the United States Public Health Service or [such
]other agency of the United States government that facilities are available for the
care or treatment of any person [heretofore ]hospitalized in any mental hospital or
other institution in this state for the care of individuals with a mental
illness[mentally ill persons] and that such person is eligible for such care or
treatment, the secretary, upon recommendation by any such hospital or institution in
this state, is [hereby ]authorized to cause the transfer of any such person to the
Page 59 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
United States Public Health Service or other agency of the United States
government for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the
hospitalizing court shall be notified [thereof ]by the secretary.
(2) Any person transferred as provided in this section shall be deemed to be placed in
the custody of the United States Public Health Service or other agency of the United
States government pursuant to the original hospitalization the same as if he or she
had been originally so hospitalized.
(3) A[No] person shall not be transferred to any agency of the United States if he or
she be confined pursuant to conviction of any felony or misdemeanor or if he or
she has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of mental illness unless
prior to transfer the court issuing the confining order shall enter an order to transfer
after the motion and hearing. Any person transferred as provided in this section to
any agency of the United States shall be hospitalized by such agency pursuant to the
original order of hospitalization.
Section 29. KRS 202A.261 is amended to read as follows:
No public or private hospital, other than a state-operated or contracted mental hospital or
institution, shall be required to provide services under KRS 202A.008, 202A.011,
202A.028, 202A.041, 202A.051, 202A.071, [202A.081, ]202A.0811 to 202A.0831,
202A.101, 202A.141, 202A.241, 202A.251, 202A.261, 202A.271, 202B.170, 202B.200,
387.540, 504.085, 600.020, 645.020, 645.120, and 645.280 unless the hospital agrees to
provide the services. Any hospital shall make every reasonable attempt to cooperate with
the implementation of KRS 202A.008, 202A.011, 202A.028, 202A.041, 202A.051,
202A.071, [202A.081, ]202A.101, 202A.141, 202A.241, 202A.251, 202A.261,
202A.271, 202B.170, 202B.200, 387.540, 504.085, 600.020, 645.020, 645.120, and
645.280.
Section 30. KRS 202A.271 is amended to read as follows:
Each public or private hospital, other than a state-operated or contracted mental hospital
Page 60 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
or institution, which provides services under KRS 202A.008, 202A.011, 202A.028,
202A.041, 202A.051, 202A.071, [202A.081, ]202A.0811 to 202A.0831, 202A.101,
202A.141, 202A.241, 202A.251, 202A.261, 202A.271, 202B.170, 202B.200, 387.540,
504.085, 600.020, 645.020, 645.120, and 645.280 shall be paid for the services at the
same rates the hospital negotiates with the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities or the regional community program for
mental health and for individuals with an intellectual disability.
Section 31. KRS 387.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Prior to a hearing on a petition for a determination of partial disability or
disability and the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator, an interdisciplinary evaluation report shall be
filed with the court. The report may be filed as a single and joint report of the
interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it may otherwise be constituted by the
separate reports filed by each individual of the team.
(b) If the court and all parties to the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the
admissibility of the report or reports, the report or reports shall be admitted
into evidence and shall be considered by the court or the jury if one is
impaneled.
(c) The report shall be compiled by at least three (3) individuals, including:
1. A physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician
assistant;
2. A psychologist licensed or certified under the provisions of KRS
Chapter 319; and
3. A person licensed or certified as a social worker or an employee of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services who has at least one (1) year of
investigative experience and has completed training in conducting
decisional capacity assessments. The social worker shall, when possible,
Page 61 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
be chosen from among employees of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services residing or working in the area, and there shall be no additional
compensation for their service on the interdisciplinary evaluation team.
(2) At least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the report shall have
knowledge of the particular disability which the respondent is alleged to have or
knowledge of the skills required of the respondent to care for himself and his estate.
(3) If the respondent is alleged to be partially disabled or disabled due to mental illness,
at least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the interdisciplinary
evaluation report shall be a qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS
202A.011[(13)]. If the respondent is alleged to be partially disabled or disabled due
to an intellectual disability, at least one (1) person participating in the compilation
of the evaluation report shall be a qualified professional in the area of intellectual
disabilities as defined in KRS 202B.010(12).
(4) The interdisciplinary evaluation report shall contain:
(a) A description of the nature and extent of the respondent's disabilities, if any;
(b) Current evaluations of the respondent's social, intellectual, physical, and
educational condition, adaptive behavior, and social skills. Such evaluations
may be based on prior evaluations not more than three (3) months old, except
that evaluations of the respondent's intellectual condition may be based on
individual intelligence test scores not more than one (1) year old;
(c) An opinion as to whether guardianship or conservatorship is needed, the type
of guardianship or conservatorship needed, if any, and the reasons therefor;
(d) An opinion as to the length of time guardianship or conservatorship will be
needed by the respondent, if at all, and the reasons therefor;
(e) If limited guardianship or conservatorship is recommended, a further
recommendation as to the scope of the guardianship or conservatorship,
specifying particularly the rights to be limited and the corresponding powers
Page 62 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
and duties of the limited guardian or limited conservator;
(f) A description of the social, educational, medical, and rehabilitative services
currently being utilized by the respondent, if any;
(g) A determination whether alternatives to guardianship or conservatorship are
available;
(h) A recommendation as to the most appropriate treatment or rehabilitation plan
and living arrangement for the respondent and the reasons therefor;
(i) A listing of all medications the respondent is receiving, the dosage, and a
description of the impact of the medication upon the respondent's mental and
physical condition and behavior;
(j) An opinion whether attending a hearing on a petition filed under KRS
387.530 would subject the respondent to serious risk of harm;
(k) The names and addresses of all individuals who examined or interviewed the
respondent or otherwise participated in the evaluation; and
(l) Any dissenting opinions or other comments by the evaluators.
(5) The evaluation report may be compiled by a community center for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability, a licensed facility for mentally ill or
developmentally disabled persons, if the respondent is a resident of such facility, or
a similar agency.
(6) In all cases where the respondent is a resident of a licensed facility for mentally ill
or developmentally disabled persons and the petition is filed by an employee of that
facility, the petition shall be accompanied by an interdisciplinary evaluation report
prepared by the facility.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the court shall order
appropriate evaluations to be performed by qualified persons or a qualified agency.
The report shall be prepared and filed with the court and copies mailed to the
attorneys for both parties at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. All items
Page 63 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
specified in subsection (4) of this section shall be included in the report.
(8) If the person evaluated is a poor person as defined in KRS 453.190, the examiners
shall be paid by the county in which the petition is filed upon an order of allowance
entered by the court. Payment shall be in an amount which is reasonable as
determined by the court, except no payment shall be required of the county for an
evaluation performed by a salaried employee of a state agency for an evaluation
performed within the course of his employment. Additionally, no payment shall be
required of the county for an evaluation performed by a salaried employee of a
community center for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability or
private facility or agency where the costs incurred by the center, facility, or agency
are reimbursable through third-party payors. Affidavits or other competent evidence
shall be admissible to prove the services rendered but not to prove their value.
(9) The respondent may file a response to the evaluation report no later than five (5)
days prior to the hearing.
(10) The respondent may secure an independent evaluation. If the respondent is unable
to pay for the evaluation, compensation for the independent evaluation may be paid
by the county in an amount which is reasonable as determined by the court.
Section 32. KRS 625.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Circuit Court may involuntarily terminate all parental rights of a parent of a
named child, if the Circuit Court finds from the record by clear and convincing
evidence that:
(a) 1. The child has been adjudged to be an abused or neglected child, as
defined in KRS 600.020[(1)], by a court of competent jurisdiction;
2. The child is found to be an abused or neglected child, as defined in KRS
600.020[(1)], by the Circuit Court in this proceeding;
3. The child is found to have been diagnosed with neonatal abstinence
syndrome at the time of birth, unless his or her birth mother:
Page 64 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
a. Was prescribed and properly using medication for a legitimate
medical condition as directed by a health care practitioner that may
have led to the neonatal abstinence syndrome;
b. Is currently, or within ninety (90) days after the birth, enrolled in
and maintaining substantial compliance with both a substance
abuse treatment or recovery program and a regimen of prenatal
care or postnatal care as recommended by her health care
practitioner throughout the remaining term of her pregnancy or the
appropriate time after her pregnancy; or
c. In the absence of a prescription for the treatment of a legitimate
medical condition, agrees, prior to discharge from the hospital, to
participate in a court-ordered assessment by a drug treatment
provider and the assigning of a certified peer support specialist for
referral to appropriate treatment, and agrees to participate in
treatment which shall commence within ninety (90) days after the
birth; or
4. The parent has been convicted of a criminal charge relating to the
physical or sexual abuse or neglect of any child and that physical or
sexual abuse, neglect, or emotional injury to the child named in the
present termination action is likely to occur if the parental rights are not
terminated;
(b) 1. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services has filed a petition with the
court pursuant to KRS 620.180 or 625.050; or
2. A child-placing agency licensed by the cabinet, any county or
Commonwealth's attorney, or a parent has filed a petition with the court
under KRS 625.050; and
(c) Termination would be in the best interest of the child.
Page 65 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
(2) A[No] termination of parental rights shall not be ordered unless the Circuit Court
also finds by clear and convincing evidence the existence of one (1) or more of the
following grounds:
(a) That the parent has abandoned the child for a period of not less than ninety
(90) days;
(b) That the parent has inflicted or allowed to be inflicted upon the child, by other
than accidental means, serious physical injury;
(c) That the parent has continuously or repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be
inflicted upon the child, by other than accidental means, physical injury or
emotional harm;
(d) That the parent has been convicted of a felony that involved the infliction of
serious physical injury to any child;
(e) That the parent, for a period of not less than six (6) months, has continuously
or repeatedly failed or refused to provide or has been substantially incapable
of providing essential parental care and protection for the child and that there
is no reasonable expectation of improvement in parental care and protection,
considering the age of the child;
(f) That the parent has caused or allowed the child to be sexually abused or
exploited;
(g) That the parent, for reasons other than poverty alone, has continuously or
repeatedly failed to provide or is incapable of providing essential food,
clothing, shelter, medical care, or education reasonably necessary and
available for the child's well-being and that there is no reasonable expectation
of significant improvement in the parent's conduct in the immediately
foreseeable future, considering the age of the child;
(h) That:
1. The parent's parental rights to another child have been involuntarily
Page 66 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
terminated;
2. The child named in the present termination action was born subsequent
to or during the pendency of the previous termination; and
3. The conditions or factors which were the basis for the previous
termination finding have not been corrected;
(i) That the parent has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of having caused
or contributed to the death of another child as a result of physical or sexual
abuse or neglect;
(j) That the child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the cabinet
for fifteen (15) cumulative months out of forty-eight (48) months preceding
the filing of the petition to terminate parental rights; or
(k) That the child has been removed from the biological or legal parents more
than two (2) times in a twenty-four (24) month period by the cabinet or a
court.
(3) In determining the best interest of the child and the existence of a ground for
termination, the Circuit Court shall consider the following factors:
(a) Mental illness as defined by KRS 202A.011[(9)], or an intellectual disability
as defined by KRS 202B.010(9) of the parent as certified by a qualified
mental health professional, or a disability as defined in KRS 199.011, if the
mental illness, intellectual disability, or disability renders the parent
consistently unable to care for the immediate and ongoing physical or
psychological needs of the child for extended periods of time;
(b) Acts of abuse or neglect as defined in KRS 600.020[(1)] toward any child in
the family;
(c) If the child has been placed with the cabinet, whether the cabinet has, prior to
the filing of the petition:
1. Made reasonable efforts as defined in KRS 620.020 to reunite the child
Page 67 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
with the parents unless one or more of the circumstances enumerated in
KRS 610.127 for not requiring reasonable efforts have been
substantiated in a written finding by the District Court; or
2. Provided a parent with a disability as defined in KRS 199.011 with
targeted adaptive and supportive services based on an individual
assessment of the parent, or has received a written acknowledgement
from the parent knowingly and affirmatively rejecting the offered
services;
(d) The efforts and adjustments the parent has made in his or her circumstances,
conduct, or conditions to make it in the child's best interest to return the child
to his or her home within a reasonable period of time, considering the age of
the child;
(e) The physical, emotional, and mental health of the child and the prospects for
the improvement of the child's welfare if termination is ordered; and
(f) The payment or the failure to pay a reasonable portion of substitute physical
care and maintenance if financially able to do so.
(4) If the child has been placed with the cabinet, the parent may present testimony
concerning the reunification, adaptive or supportive services offered by the cabinet,
and whether additional services would be likely to bring about lasting parental
adjustment enabling a return of the child to the parent.
(5) If the parent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the child will not
continue to be an abused or neglected child as defined in KRS 600.020[(1)] if
returned to the parent, or if the parent proves by a preponderance of the evidence
that appropriate and specifically targeted adaptive or supportive services based
upon an individual assessment of the parent have not been offered or provided to
the parent, the court in its discretion may determine not to terminate parental rights.
(6) Upon the conclusion of proof and argument of counsel, the Circuit Court shall enter
Page 68 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 485/GA
findings of fact, conclusions of law, and a decision as to each parent-respondent
within thirty (30) days either:
(a) Terminating the right of the parent; or
(b) Dismissing the petition and stating whether the child shall be returned to the
parent or shall remain in the custody of the state.
Section 33. The following KRS section is repealed:
202A.081 Court-ordered community-based outpatient treatment.
Section 34. By November 1, 2026, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
shall provide a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Health Services and the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary
describing the existing services, treatments, and supports for mental illness and serious
mental illness available to persons who are subject to proceedings under KRS Chapter
202A and 202C and making recommendations for ways to strengthen, increase, and
broaden these services, treatments, and supports as appropriate. The descriptions shall
include type of providers, eligibility criteria, accessibility, and geographical locations of
the services, treatments, and supports.
Section 35. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services and Department for
Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall engage the services
of the Treatment Advocacy Center to develop and implement a statewide training
program to facilitate implementation of this Act and ensure consistent application of this
Act across state and local agencies.
Section 36. This Act takes effect October 1, 2026.
Page 69 of 69
HB048510.100 - 1030 - XXXX 2/19/2026 8:07 PM GA